West Virginia, session 2026, HB4798.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9F. SCHOOL ACCESS SAFETY ACT. §18-9F-9a. Wearable panic alert system, "Alyssa's law". (a) The state board in conjunction with the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management shall promulgate by December 31, 2026, a legislative rule in accordance with §29A-3B-1 et seq. of this code, and if necessary may promulgate an emergency rule in accordance with that article, permitting a wearable panic alert system device to be implemented at every public school in the state contingent upon available funding. Each county board may apply to the West Virginia Department of Homeland Security for funding from the fund created pursuant to §18-9F-9a(f) of this section. This section shall be known as Alyssa’s law. (b) Each wearable panic alert system device shall be capable of integrating with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile activations and initiating a campus-wide lockdown notification.(c) Each county board may provide each school employee in a school facility with a wearable panic alert device that allows for immediate contact with local emergency response agencies.(d) Prior to the first day of school each year, each county board shall ensure that all school facility personnel who utilize the wearable panic alert devices receive training on the protocol for and appropriate use of the panic alert device.(e) Each county board shall ensure that all security data within a school facility is accessible by a local law-enforcement agency and coordinate with the local law-enforcement agency to establish appropriate access protocols. Accessible security data includes cameras, maps, and access control.(f) The Alyssa Alhadeff School Safety Fund is hereby created within the Treasury of the State. The fund shall be administered by the West Virginia Department of Homeland Security and shall consist of all monies from any source, including, but not limited to, all fees, gifts, grants, bequests, or transfers from any source. Expenditures from the fund shall be available for the implementation of mobile panic buttons and similar school safety equipment.(g) The provisions of this section shall sunset by December 31, 2029.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home